Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-2] Statement of findings and
declaration of purposes. The legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1) The rapid expansion of international business,
trade, and commerce among nations in the Pacific region provides important
opportunities for the State of Hawaii to participate in such business, trade,
and commerce;

(2) There will inevitably arise, from time to time,
disagreements and disputes arising from such business, trade, and commercial
relations and transactions that are amenable to resolution by means of
international arbitration, mediation, conciliation, and other forms of dispute
resolution in lieu of international litigation;

(3) It is the policy of this State to encourage the
use of arbitration, mediation, and conciliation to reduce disputes arising out
of international business, trade, commercial, and other relationships; and

(4) It is declared that the objective of encouraging
the development of Hawaii as an international center for the resolution of
international business, commercial, trade, and other disputes be supported
through the establishment of certain legal authorities as set forth in this
chapter. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Paragraphs redesignated and in paragraph (3), "and"
added after ending punctuation pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next